nlb/book-to-pef/src/main/resources/hyph/hyph_nb_NO.dic
ISO8859-1
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
.a4
.aa4
.ab4ba
.ab7be
.ab6s5t
.ac6tin
.adel4s
.ad8la.
.ad6le.
.ad2r
.ad1s2
.af7f
.af5t4
.af5f6u
.ag6na.
.ag6ne.
.ag4r
.ai2
.a6k
.ak6ka.
.ak6ke.
.ak3kl
.ak3kr
.ak6ne.
.ak6r
.ak8sa.
.ak4se.
.ak6ta
.ak4te.
.akte4r
.akter5e
.ak5tr
.akva7
.a6l
.albu5en
.alfa3
.al4ge.
.al5gi
.al6ka.
.al4ke.
.al4kom
.al4la.
.al4le.
.al5leg
.al5lo
.all5s6
.al4ma.
.al8me.
.al5m6in
.al4na
.al6s7k
.als5o
.alt4a
.al4ta.
.al5tar
.al4te.
.alt3o
.al6ve.
.am7b
.a6me
.am6ma.
.am4me.
.am4s4
.am6ta
.a6n
.ana3b
.an4da.
.an4de.
.an5d4ra
.an4d5ø
.an3er
.anes5
.an4ga.
.an3ge
.an4ge.
.ange4s
.an4ja.
.an4ka.
.an4ke.
.an4la.
.an3n
.an4na.
.an7nal
.ann4e
.an4ne.
.an5s8
.an4sa.
.an4se.
.ant2
.an4ta.
.an4te.
.an5tem
.an5tep
.an4ti.
.an6tin
.an4tis
.an4tiv
.ap8lan
.ap1p6
.ap8t
.arbi5
.ar6de.
.are4o7
.ar4ge.
.ar5ges
.ari6a
.ari8e
.arie5ne
.ar5ka
.ar8ka.
.arlan9
.ar4me.
.ar7mea
.ar4na.
.ar3ne
.ar4ne.
.ar5nes
.ar6ra.
.ar6r7u
.ar6ta.
.ar4te.
.ar9ti
.ar6va.
.ar4ve.
.ar4ved
.ar4ver
.arvi6
.a6s
.as8ka
.as4ke.
.as5kese
.as4le.
.as6pa.
.as5s
.ast5ru
.at4h
.at4ki
.at4le.
.at4na.
.at2o4
.at3s
.atte4
.att6r
.a5ty
.au8de
.au6e
.au8ga
.au4ge
.au4ka.
.au8le.
.au4r
.au6sa.
.au6se.
.aus9k
.au4sp
.avi2
.av7i6d
.av7inde
.av4la.
.av4le.
.av7s6
.b6
.ba6by
.ba6la.
.ba4le.
.ba4ne.
.ban4k3l
.ba4re.
.ba4ri.
.ba8te.
.be4de.
.bede4n
.be6d5ene
.be4d5et
.be8di.
.be3e4d
.be6ke.
.be4la.
.be9nar
.be4ne.
.be6ra.
.be6re.
.be4res
.ber6ett
.be8ri.
.be7ska
.be6sten
.be4ta.
.be6te.
.be5t4v
.bi6de.
.bi6en
.bi4le.
.bilet5
.bi6t3r
.bl4
.bla4d
.ble4k3
.ble5k4e
.blek4k3f
.blekk3s4t6
.blekk9s8v4
.bling5
.bo8da
.bo8de.
.bogs8
.bok5
.bo4k4en.
.bo8la
.bon2
.bo4na.
.bor6t5
.bort6e
.bor8ti8
.bort9r
.brudd7s6
.bruddså7
.bu6da.
.bu3d6r
.bu4et
.bus6sy
.by6de.
.by8ta.
.bæ2
.bø6k5a
.bø8nen
.bø8ner
.c4
.ca4en.
.car4s5
.ca6se
.ce6b
.cos1
.co4st
.d6
.da4ge.
.da4le.
.dags6e
.da2m
.da4ne.
.da4ta
.dau3s
.deka9r
.deko7d
.de4le.
.de4l5ei
.del5s6
.de4mi.
.demo7e
.den5sl
.de4re.
.de4r5et
.de4ri. 
.de6r3i4
.de7r4i5v
.de4r5om
.de6s5m
.de4so
.de4sto
.de4u
.devi5s
.di2a
.di5e4l
.di6er
.di4et.
.di9f6t
.di4ne.
.dings7a
.di4sk
.di8s3t
.do4en
.do4er
.do8et
.dome5
.do4ra
.do6re.
.drau4m
.ds4
.du4a
.du4en.
.du4er
.duft3
.du4ge.
.duk3n
.du4se.
.du4st
.dy4re.
.dø6la.
.dø6r3
.dø7r4a
.dø7r4e
.dø4ve.
.då5ren
.då7ret
.e6
.eb4ba
.ecu6
.ed4da
.ed4le.
.efo7
.ef4ta
.efta5s
.ef6ter
.eg8de.
.ege2
.ege5l
.eg6ga.
.eg4ge.
.eg4gel
.eg8la.
.eg4le.
.eg6na.
.eg4ne.
.ego7t8
.egs4
.eg8se.
.eg5si
.ei2
.eid5a
.ei5den
.ei4ga.
.ei7ger
.eik5a
.ei4ke.
.ei3l
.ei3m
.ei8ma.
.ei8me.
.ein7as
.ei3ni
.ein5og5
.ein5s6ta
.ein8s7to
.ei9rar
.ei5res
.eir9u 
.ei5te
.eit9r
.ekk4o
.ek4le.
.ek3li
.ek6ne.
.ek4r
.ek8sa.
.ek3se
.ek8se.
.ek4sp
.eks6pi
.eks3t4
.ek5s4ta
.ek8ta
.ek4te.
.ek7to
.el8da.
.el4de.
.el4g5r
.eli5ne
.el3k
.el5l
.el6s
.els6a
.els4kl
.els6t
.el6ta.
.el6te.
.el6veg
.em3b2
.emfa9
.em4ma.
.em8me.
.em6na.
.em5p
.en5a
.en4da.
.en4de.
.end5r
.en4ga.
.en6gav
.en3ge
.en4ge.
.en6g5r
.engs6
.en6ka
.en4ke.
.en5og5
.en6sa
.en4se.
.en5so
.en3sp
.en5t
.en6te.
.ent4r
.en6t5ra
.ent8re
.en3ø4
.ep6t
.er8a
.er4e
.er4g5r
.er4ke
.er4la.
.er4le.
.er6ma.
.er4me.
.er4mek
.er4na.
.er6ta.
.er4te.
.es9ast
.es1k
.es3ka
.es8ka.
.es4ke.
.es5l
.es8la.
.es8le.
.es3p
.es6pa.
.es6r
.es8sa.
.es4se.
.es4so
.es5ta
.es3te
.es6te.
.es7tet
.es5ti
.est3r
.es7tu
.et8la.
.et8le.
.et4na
.et4ne.
.et4s
.et8sa.
.et5s4e
.et6se.
.ets4i
.et1te4
.et6ter
.et6ti
.ev8ja
.ev4je.
.ev4ne.
.ex4
.f4
.fa2e
.fag3s4
.fa4ne.
.fan3t4o
.fe4e
.feil5i
.fe2l
.fela9
.fel5l
.fel4ta
.fe4ma
.fe8me
.fem5o6g5
.fem5t
.fer8ro
.fer6s
.fe8sl
.fe8st5
.fes3t6e
.fi4b5
.fi6a
.fi4le.
.fire5o6g5
.fis6k
.fjel4
.fla4t5o
.fo4bi.
.fol2
.fo2r
.for3d6ri
.for7d6ra
.for5en.
.form5s
.for7s6o
.fre6e
.fri5e6re
.fug2
.fu6ge.
.ful2
.fu8se.
.fy8se
.fø8rel
.g6
.gaf7
.ga4le.
.ga8li.
.ga4me
.ga4ne.
.gang5s4
.gas4
.gas5ta
.ga2t
.ga4ve.
.ga9vee
.ge2a
.gel4e
.ge3ne
.ge6ni5
.gen5s
.ge4o
.ge4st
.ge5s6tap
.ge9sv
.gha5
.gift5s
.gi4n
.gi4s
.gis7p
.gi8v3a
.gl6
.glo6i
.glo9v
.gly5s
.glø9se
.gnå7la
.go5des
.gos7
.gra4v3end
.grei4e
.grunn5s
.grus5s
.gu4de.
.gud3v4
.gu4lat
.gus1
.gu4tu.
.gø2
.gås4e5
.gå4v
.h4
.hai5s6
.ha6ka.
.ha8ma.
.hand5s6l
.handsla9
.ha6v5ak
.ha6vi
.he4er.
.hei5e
.he2n
.hen3i2
.he6r5i6
.he6r5o6
.he9r6oe
.he7r6oi
.he7r6ol
.he9r8os
.hes4s5
.het6s5
.het7s6e
.he4t5
.he5t6e
.hil4l
.hi4n
.hi6re.
.ho2d
.ho2e
.ho4re.
.ho5ren
.ho7ret
.ho8ta.
.ho8va.
.hu4di
.hus6val
.hvit3
.hvi3t4e
.hy6ra.
.hy4re.
.høi5
.hø4re
.hø4va
.hø4ve.
.høy6st5æ
.hå8en.
.hå8er
.hånd5s6l
.i2
.i3a4
.i3bl
.i4da
.ifø5re
.ig8la.
.ig4le.
.i4her
.ik2
.ik6k
.ikke5
.i3k6l
.ik5t
.ik8te.
.i5kv
.i3la
.i4la.
.i8lande
.ilbo8da
.il6d3r
.il6de.
.i3leg
.i6les
.il4ja
.il6je.
.il6ke.
.il4le.
.il6sk
.il4te.
.i6me
.imø5te.
.in5ad
.in5de
.in8ga.
.in4ge.
.in3gr
.in6gri
.in5k6
.in6ka.
.in4n3
.in4ne.
.in5n6e
.in6n7eks
.in6n7ets
.in6n7ett
.in4n3i
.in5s
.in7tes
.io4na
.io4nom
.i4rer
.ir7k8
.ir8ra.
.ir6re.
.i6sa
.i3sc
.i6se
.is7k6
.isla8ga
.is6lam
.is4le.
.is4let
.is4me.
.is8na.
.is8ne.
.is5pa
.i5spe
.is3s4
.is6sa.
.is4se.
.is5sk
.ist6
.is8te.
.i5sted
.i5stem
.is7ti
.i6s7tj
.i6s7tr
.is8ut.
.i6s5ø
.i5ti
.i3va
.i4van
.i4var.
.i3ve
.i4vel
.i6ven
.i4ver.
.i4vere
.iv8ra.
.iv6re.
.i3ø
.j4
.ja4de.
.ja6e
.ja4ne
.ja8se.
.ja4va.
.je2a
.je2l
.je2m
.je5re
.jern5s4
.je4ta
.ji4
.jo8en.
.jo4se.
.ju6a
.ju6la
.jule3
.ju4li3
.jø4dep
.k6
.kaf2
.ka6la.
.ka6li.
.kalve5l8
.ka5me
.ka3na
.ka4ne.
.ka4p3r
.ka4ra.
.ka5r6a5v
.ka6re.
.ka5rin
.ka4te.
.ka5t6h
.kau9k
.ka6va.
.ka4ve.
.ke6e
.kel3
.kier3
.ki4na
.ki7ni
.kino3
.kir2
.ki4se.
.ki8va.
.ki6ve.
.kje3de5
.kje4k
.kjek7l
.kjønn4
.kle4s
.kli5ne
.klo9va
.kly7sa
.kna7se
.kne4p3r
.ko6da.
.ko7gr
.ko4la
.ko3le
.ko8le.
.kol5j
.ko3pe
.ko6pe.
.kor6s5ed
.ko4se.
.ko6ta.
.ko4te.
.ko6ve.
.kring5s
.ks6
.ku5f4l
.ku4le
.ku8ra.
.ku4re.
.ku8ta.
.ku8te.
.kva4r1a
.kve9ka
.kve5ke
.ky8la.
.ky4le.
.ky6te.
.kø3s
.kå6pa
.l6
.la4da.
.la4de.
.la4ga
.la4ge.
.la5ger
.la4ma.
.la6ta.
.la4te.
.la3tr
.la4va
.la3ve
.la4ve.
.le8ar
.le4da.
.le4de.
.le4er
.le6et
.le2f
.lef3l
.lega5ta
.le4ge.
.le4gel
.le8gi.
.lei5er.
.lei4ve
.le4ke.
.le4k5r
.lemu9
.le4ne.
.le6o7
.le7s6a
.le4se.
.le4sek
.le4ses
.le4s5p
.le2t
.le7ta
.let6tan
.le2u3
.le3va
.le4va.
.le4ve.
.le4ves
.li8a
.li4de.
.li4e4
.li5ene
.li2g
.liga3
.li2k
.lik5k6
.lik3o
.lik3s
.li4ma
.link6
.li6ra
.li4re.
.li4sa
.li4se.
.li4ta.
.li4te.
.li5ti
.li4ve.
.li4v5en
.liv8s7u6
.liv4s5v
.lo4e
.lo6ge.
.lo8gi.
.lo6g5r
.lo4i
.lo6na
.lo8o
.lo6ri
.lo8sa.
.lo4se.
.lo6te
.lo4va
.lo3ve
.lo4ve.
.lu4d
.lu2e
.lu4na
.lu6pa
.lu4pe.
.lu6ra.
.lu4re.
.lu6se.
.lu4ta.
.lu9tas
.ly4de.
.lyd3s
.ly8e
.ly8ge
.ly4se.
.ly4sk
.ly5s6e
.lys5s6
.ly8str
.ly4te.
.ly4ve.
.lø8de.
.lø6en.
.lø8ne.
.lø6pa.
.lø4pe.
.løv5i
.løye5ne
.lå8ma
.lå5re
.lå6re.
.lå4te.
.m8
.ma4ge.
.mag9r
.ma3ka
.ma4ke.
.mak6t5at
.makt5s
.ma4le.
.ma4li.
.ma4na.
.ma4ne.
.ma4ni.
.ma4ra.
.ma4re.
.ma4ri.
.ma4sa.
.ma4si
.ma6st
.ma8ta
.ma6t8h
.mat5t8o
.ma4v
.me4d3
.me6d5ei
.me6d4i
.me6d7in
.me6d5r
.mei5er.
.mei5et
.mek5l
.me6la.
.mel3l6o
.me4l5ø
.me4ne.
.me3ri
.me4sk
.me2t6a3
.me3ta4ll
.mes5ti
.me4tri
.mi6kj
.mi4le.
.mi4me.
.mi4ni.
.mi4nik
.min4k3
.min5k4e
.mi6s3t4
.mne6
.mo5de
.mo6er
.mo4na.
.mo8ne.
.mon4st
.mons6t5r 
.mor5d6e
.mo4re.
.mor3t6a5
.mo4se.
.mo4ta
.mo4tek
.mo4ter
.mo4tr
.mo5v
.mu8ga
.mu8ge.
.mu6le.
.mul5es
.mur7
.mu5r8e
.my8ka
.my4ke.
.mø4re.
.mø5res
.mø2t
.må6la.
.mål3o
.n8
.nabo3
.na6ge.
.nak2
.na8ke.
.nan5s
.na4r
.na4sa.
.nat2
.na3tr
.nat6tr
.ne4de.
.ne4den
.ne4d5i
.ne4d3r
.ned3s4
.nei5e
.ne8pa.
.ne6pe.
.ne2s
.ne4t
.ni8ar
.ni6er
.nig4l
.ni4na.
.ni5o6g5
.ni4pa.
.ni6pe.
.ni8sa
.ni6se.
.nita9
.ni4to
.ni4va
.no6de.
.no6e
.no8ka
.no4me.
.no8mi.
.no4r
.no8se
.no8si.
.no4va.
.nu4e
.ny5a
.ny8sa.
.ny6se.
.ny4te.
.nær9ast.
.næ4re.
.nød4d
.nø4re.
.nå4de.
.nå6le.
.o6
.obo5e
.od4da.
.od4de.
.od8la.
.od8le.
.offsi6
.of4te.
.of5teb
.og4
.ok1k
.ok8ka.
.ok8ke
.ok4se.
.old3s
.ol4ga.
.oli5
.ol8la
.ol8le.
.ol6m
.om1
.om4ar.
.om6bo.
.om4e6n
.om4gå.
.om4me
.om5s2
.on4de.
.on5des
.ond3s
.on6kl
.on6na
.on8ne.
.op5ar
.op4pa
.op4pe
.opp7el
.op4pi
.opp3l
.oppla8te.
.opp5s6
.op7r
.opt6
.or4da
.or4de.
.or4del
.or4dr
.ord5s4
.or5ga
.or6ka.
.or4ke.
.or6me.
.or4re.
.ort6
.or6va
.osa5
.os4k
.os4s
.os4te.
.ot5r
.ot7t8a
.ot4ta.
.ot4te.
.ot4tes
.ot3to
.ot4to.
.ove6
.over3
.overen6d
.over3i4
.over5k8
.ov8re
.ov5u
.p6
.pa8la.
.pa4le.
.pa5n6e
.pa6n7eu
.pa5n6i
.pa6re.
.pe3do
.pe4ke.
.pek5t
.pel4sj
.pe4ne.
.pe2p
.pep3r
.pe8sa.
.pese5t
.pe4st
.ph2
.pi6le.
.pi6p
.pi9ra
.pi2s
.plen5g6
.plus6s5 
.plus7s6e
.plø7se
.po4et
.po3la
.po8la.
.po4le.
.po4log
.po2p1
.po2p2e
.pop3p
.po3p2u
.po8ra
.po6re.
.po4res
.po6st
.po8ta.
.po6tek
.ps2
.pøn3
.pøn9s6
.på5d6
.r6
.ra6da.
.ra6et
.ra4ga.
.ra4ge.
.ra4ja.
.ra4ka
.raks7
.ra2m
.ra4na
.ra4ne.
.ran7s6a
.ra6pa.
.ra6pe.
.rap4s
.rap5s4e
.rap5s4o4
.ra4re.
.ra6sa.
.ra7ti
.ra6va.
.ra4ve.
.re4al
.re6da.
.re4de.
.ree6l
.rege4l
.re4gi.
.rei2
.rei7de
.rei5er.
.re4ins
.re6ka.
.re4ke.
.re8klar
.re8kle
.re4kli
.re6kn
.re8le.
.re4ma.
.re4na.
.re4ne.
.ren6sk
.ren4t
.rep5s
.res9s
.re5s6tan
.rett7s8kri
.re4ve.
.re4ves
.rev9n
.ri2d
.ri8e
.rie5ne
.ri6ka.
.ri6ma
.ri4me.
.ri4pa.
.ri4pe.
.ri4p5o
.ri4sa.
.ri4se.
.ris5ko
.ri4s3ø
.ri4ta.
.ri6te.
.ri6va.
.ri4ve.
.ro4an
.ro4de.
.ro8di
.ro4e
.ro8ke.
.ro4ma.
.ro4mi
.ro6pa
.ro9par
.ro3pe
.ro4pe.
.ro4sa
.ro9sar
.ro4se.
.ro4sed
.ro4ta.
.ro4te.
.ro4tek4
.ro8va
.ro3ve
.ro8ve.
.ru8ga.
.ru4ge.
.rug9le
.ru8ka
.ru4na.
.ru4ne.
.runes6
.run7g
.ru4se.
.ru4sk
.ru8va.
.ru4ve.
.ry2e
.rye7ne
.ry6ke.
.rød2
.rød7s4
.rø8le.
.rø4re.
.rø1v
.rø8va.
.rø4ve.
.røy7e
.rå8da.
.rå4de.
.rå4en
.rå8er.
.råg8
.rå6ka.
.rå4ke.
.rå3k4l
.rå6na.
.rå8sa.
.s6
.sa4ge.
.sag6n
.sa4la.
.sa4le.
.sa4me.
.sa4mer
.san6d7
.san7d8e
.san7d8i
.san8s7ku
.sau6e
.sch6
.se2b
.se2e
.se4i
.se4k5l
.sek4s5o6g5
.sel4v5
.sel4v5i6
.se6na.
.se4ne.
.sen7s
.se4ra.
.ser7vel
.se4te.
.sha9ke.
.si2d
.si6er
.si6ga.
.si4ge.
.sik5k6e
.si8la.
.si4le.
.si4ne.
.sinn6s5
.si4ra.
.si5str
.si4va
.si4ve.
.sje4i
.sju5o6g5
.sk4
.ska7ka
.ska5ke
.skat4
.skei5d
.ski6n
.skinns6
.sko7de.
.skog5u
.skritt9s8
.skudd5s6
.skuddså7
.sku6m5
.sky6f7la
.skå5ra
.slim5
.slotts5
.slu9ka
.slu5ke.
.slø5se
.sma4s
.smas5k
.smo9g
.små3
.små7k6
.små9l
.små5t4
.småt5t
.sn4
.sne3
.snitt5s6
.snø3k
.soa8
.so8de
.somma4
.son6a
.sop4pa
.sor4t5
.so4ta.
.s8p6
.spa5ra
.spe6e
.spi9la
.spri5s6
.st6
.sta9ka
.sta5li
.stat4s
.sted4s
.ste4i
.stein7a8
.stein7s8
.stem4m
.stev9na
.sti7me
.sto5ne
.sto6ra
.strek5s6
.stu8a
.stu9va
.stål5l6
.sund5s6
.su4ri
.su5te
.sv8
.sva5la
.sva5ra.
.sva5re
.svar5s
.sver8n
.syd5 
.sy5d6e
.sy6na.
.sy4ne.
.sy5ter
.sy3ti
.sy6v5
.sy6v5o6g5
.sz6
.sæ2
.sær1
.sær3e4g
.sø8ka
.sø4ke.
.søl6v5
.sør3a
.søye5
.søy6en
.så5pen
.så3re
.t8
.ta8ke.
.tak9r
.tak5sk
.tak9s8p
.ta4la.
.ta4le.
.ta4les
.tal4li
.tam5m
.tan5de
.ta4p5r
.ta4ra.
.ta4re.
.ta2s
.te4e
.te6i
.tei9er
.te8ke.
.te4ma.
.te6o
.te8ne.
.te4se.
.te7si
.te4sta
.te4str
.th2
.ti8a
.tid5r
.tid6s3
.ti4de.
.ti4e
.ti4g3r
.ti4ki
.ti4l5
.tili6
.ti4med
.ti4na.
.ti4ne.
.ti4p5l
.ti4s
.to5arm
.to6en.
.to4er.
.to6et.
.tokk8
.to6le.
.to6na.
.to5o6g5
.to4ra.
.to4re.
.to6reb
.to3ro
.torsk6e5
.tor4s5v
.to5rye
.to4str
.tota9la.
.to5t8
.to8te.
.to6va
.to4ve.
.tr6
.tra7c
.tre3b
.tre7p
.tre5o6g5
.tre6skja
.tre3s8ko
.tre3sp
.tre5s6t
.ts2
.tsj2
.tu4en.
.tu6na
.tu4ne.
.tu6ra.
.tu4re.
.tu8ve.
.tve6n
.tver6r5a6
.två7g
.ty6da.
.ty4de.
.ty8et
.ty8re.
.tyr8s9
.ty5ter
.ty5ti
.tæ4re.
.tøv9d
.tø6ve.
.tø9ver
.tø5vet
.tå5ker
.tå4le.
.tåp9n
.tå5ren
.tå7ret
.u5a6
.u1b2
.u6berg
.u3d2
.u7de
.u3e6
.u4er.
.u6era
.u4ere
.uf4f
.uf8sa
.u4ga
.u5gi
.ug6la.
.ug8n
.u1i
.ui6m
.u1k6
.u4ka.
.u6ke
.u7kn
.u3le
.u4le.
.ule8k
.ulen4d
.u6lende
.u8lene
.u6let
.u4lin
.ul6ka
.ul4ke.
.ul4la.
.ul8le.
.ul8ma.
.ul4me.
.ul4ne.
.ul5t
.ul6te
.u1lu
.ul4v5i
.u1ly
.u3lå
.u5ma
.umu7
.u2n
.unde6ri
.und5r
.une8
.u5nek
.u9net
.un4ge.
.un2n
.unn3s
.u3no
.un4se.
.un4t
.u5nu
.u1o
.u1p
.u4pi
.up2l
.u2ra
.u5raf
.ur6an
.u6rane
.ur4d
.ure4n
.u4ret.
.u6rets
.u2r2i
.ur4ke
.ur6na
.ur4ne.
.u1ro
.ur1s
.ur8ta
.ur4te.
.urte5m8
.ur6tet
.u5rut
.u3ry
.u5rå
.u1s2
.u4sa.
.u4sas
.u5se
.u3ska
.u5sn
.u7sp
.us3se
.us6t4
.u7stek
.u5stel
.usy5r
.u2t
.uta4g
.ut5age
.u3tak
.u4ten.
.ut5esk
.ut6e7sko
.u4ti.
.ut3kan6t5
.ut4ne.
.u5tol
.ut3o6v
.ut6rer
.ut6rov
.u3trø
.ut6se.
.ut4si.
.ut3t4
